Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.110

Renewals.

(1) The renewal dates and fees for certificates of licensure shall be set by the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086. Licensees who fail to pay the renewal fee within thirty days of the due date shall pay all delinquent fees plus a penalty fee equal to one-third of the renewal fee. A licensee who fails to pay a renewal fee for a period of five years may be reinstated under such circumstances as the board determines.

(2) Any licensee in good standing may withdraw from the practice of landscape architecture by giving written notice to the director, and may within five years thereafter resume active practice upon payment of the then-current renewal fee. A licensee may be reinstated after a withdrawal of more than five years under such circumstances as the board determines.

(3) A licensed landscape architect must demonstrate continuing professional education activities since the landscape architect's last renewal or initial licensure, as the case may be; the board shall by rule describe the professional development activities required by the board. The board may decline to renew a license if the landscape architect's continuing professional education activities do not meet the standards in the board's rules. In the application of this subsection, the board shall strive to ensure that rules are consistent with the continuing professional education requirements in use by the national professional organizations representing landscape architects and in use by other cohort states. Cohort states are those other United States determined by the board to be comparable to Washington in natural factors and landscape architecture licensure.

[ 2009 c 370 s 11; 1993 c 35 s 5. Prior: 1985 c 18 s 3; 1985 c 7 s 76; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 87; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Effective date—1985 c 18: See note following RCW 18.96.040.